New Jersey, session 221, A2935.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  N.J.S.2C:33-2 is amended to read as follows: 2C:33-2.  a.  Improper behavior.  A person is guilty of a petty disorderly persons  offense, if with purpose to cause public inconvenience, annoyance or alarm, or  recklessly creating a risk thereof he (1) Engages in fighting or threatening, or in violent or tumultuous behavior; or (2) Creates a hazardous or physically dangerous condition by any act which serves no legitimate purpose of the actor. b.  Offensive language.  A person is guilty of a petty disorderly persons offense if, in a public place, and with purpose to offend the sensibilities of a hearer or in reckless disregard of the probability of so doing, he addresses unreasonably loud and offensively coarse or abusive language, given the circumstances of the person present and the setting of the utterance, to any person present. c.  A person who violates subsection a. of this section at an unpermitted mass gathering on a public beach is guilty of a disorderly persons offense. d.  A person who organizes an unpermitted mass gathering on a public beach and threatens or encourages violence, destruction of public property, or illegal drug or alcohol use during the event is guilty of a crime of the fourth degree. In addition to any other fine or penalty imposed, a person who is guilty of organizing an unpermitted mass gathering on a public beach shall be responsible for paying the cost of any damages to persons or property resulting from the unpermitted mass gathering.  If the organizer of the unpermitted mass gathering on a public beach is a minor, the legal guardian of the organizer shall be responsible for paying the cost of any damages to persons or property resulting from the unpermitted mass gathering. "Public"  means affecting or likely to affect persons in a place to which the public or a substantial group has access;  among the places included are highways, transport facilities, schools, prisons, apartment houses, places of business or amusement, or any neighborhood. Unpermitted mass gathering on a public beach means (1)  an event or occasion occurring on a public beach, organized by an identifiable source, unrestricted as to the number of attendees, and notice for which was advertised on public media including, but not limited to, social media platforms or websites; (2)  a permit to assemble has not been obtained from the municipality in which the event or occasion is held; and (3)  the number of people attending or likely to attend is sufficient to strain the planning and response resources of the community or municipality in which the event or occasion is held, a determination which, once assessed by the municipality, has been declared through a public address or other emergency notification system. (cf: N.J.S.2C:33-2) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.